Wisconsin, session 2025, SB533.
do enact as follows:SB533,14Section 1. 941.21 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB533,1,55941.21 (title) Disarming a peace an officer.SB533,21Section 2. 941.21 of the statutes is renumbered 941.21 (2) and amended to 2read:SB533,2,93941.21 (2) Whoever intentionally disarms a peace officer who is acting in his 4or her official capacity by taking a dangerous weapon or a device or container 5described under s. 941.26 (1g) (b) or (4) (a) from the officer without his or her 6consent is guilty of a Class H felony. This section subsection applies to any 7dangerous weapon or any device or container described under s. 941.26 (1g) (b) or 8(4) (a) that the officer is carrying or that is in an area within the officer’s immediate 9presence.SB533,310Section 3. 941.21 (1) and (3) of the statutes are created to read:SB533,2,1111941.21 (1) In this section, “correctional officer” means any of the following:SB533,2,1312(a) A person employed by the state or any political subdivision as a guard or 13officer whose principal duties are the supervision and discipline of inmates.SB533,2,1414(b) A juvenile correctional officer, as defined under s. 48.981 (1) (cu).SB533,2,2115(3) Whoever intentionally disarms a correctional officer who is acting in his or 16her official capacity by taking a dangerous weapon, a device or container described 17under s. 941.26 (1g) (b) or (4) (a), or any official item, such as a radio, keys, or other 18item used for the correctional officer’s duties, from the correctional officer without 19his or her consent is guilty of a Class H felony. This subsection applies to any item 20that the correctional officer is carrying or that is in an area within the correctional 21officer’s immediate presence.SB533,2,2222